Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General

§§ 21-6-101 through 21-6-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 189, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 42, §§ 1 through 4 and 6, Laws 1921, ch. 133, § 3, and Laws 1969, ch. 111, §§ 142, 143, 146, and 149, related to the membership, duties, and authority of a district boundary board.